Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201677-6101
Act, how cited.

Sections 77-6101 to 77-6106 shall be known and may be cited as the Long-Term Care Savings Plan Act.

Laws 2006, LB 965, § 1;

Laws 2016, LB756, § 2.
July 21, 2016January 1, 2018